North Carolina, session 2025, SB404.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to study the feasibility of establishing a
professional wrestling museum in the State. By July 1, 2026, the Department shall report its
findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and
Natural and Economic Resources.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S404-v-1*